Massachusetts, session 194th, H3848.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 15E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition
is hereby amended by striking out the word "sections" and inserting in place thereof the
following:- chapters.
of 1